Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 3

General Powers and Duties of Department

33-1-301. Powers of department — Contracts — Property and monetary grants — Pilot programs.

The department is empowered to enter into contractual agreements in furtherance of its functions.

The department may accept grants and gifts of funds and other property of whatever kind from any source, administer the same according to the terms of the grants or gifts, and enter cooperative programs with private and public instrumentalities, including the federal government, to improve mental health and developmental disabilities services and supports in the state.

The department may enter into contracts with other states, or political subdivisions, or corporations chartered in other states, for the purpose of providing preventive and treatment services and supports for service recipients by establishing or supporting various facilities in cooperation with the political or corporate bodies.

The department may establish or review pilot projects, including, but not limited to, projects to provide, develop, or plan service and support for its service recipients or their families through direct administration or through contracting with service providers. Pilot projects are subject to other state and federal laws.

The department of finance and administration shall furnish to the department sufficient space for the department to carry out the department's duties efficiently.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 1; 1974, ch. 802, § 3; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 33-101, 33-1-201; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 33-1-101, 33-1-201 — 33-1-209, 33-1-301 — 33-1-303 (Acts 1965, ch. 38, §§ 2, 8; 1965, ch. 82, §§ 1-2, 4-7; 1965, ch. 305, § 1; 1971, ch. 247, § 1; 1972, ch. 644, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 85, § 1; 1973, ch. 127, §§ 3, 4; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 1, 2, 5-7; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 3, 5-7, 16, 21; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 4; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(95); 1978, ch. 533, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, § 10; 1981, ch. 98, §§ 3, 4; 1981, ch. 224, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-301 - 33-302, 33-104 — 33-107, 33-308; 1984, ch. 794, § 11; 1984, ch. 922, § 1; 1986, ch. 570, § 1; 1987, ch. 98, § 1; 1988, ch. 623, § 1; 1990, ch. 920, § 1; 1990, ch. 1024, §§ 17-18; 1992, ch. 991, § 12; 1994, ch. 861, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 993, § 1; 1997, ch. 305, § 1; 1997, ch. 534, § 1; 1999, ch. 466, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2000, ch. 981, § 53) is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Acts 2005, ch. 490, § 2 provided that the commissioner of finance and administration shall identify those grant funds that are generated by § 33-1-301, or any similar grant funds that may be appropriately applied to the subject matter of the act, and shall ensure that those grant funds are used to offset the cost of the job tax credit created in § 67-4-2109 by section 1 of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Commissioner, appointment, §§ 4-3-111, 4-3-112.

Establishment of department, § 4-3-101.

Powers and duties of department, § 4-3-1603.

33-1-302. Other powers of department — Power to make grants and contracts — Cooperative programs — Rulemaking — Operation of facilities.

The department may:

Make grants and contracts under terms and conditions that the commissioner prescribes to any county, city, or profit or nonprofit corporation or any combination of them for the construction, maintenance or operation of facilities, programs, or an array of high quality prevention, early intervention, treatment, and habilitation services and supports for service recipients and their families;

Enter into cooperative programs for the construction, maintenance or operation of facilities, programs or services to provide care, habilitation and treatment for service recipients;

Make and enforce rules that are necessary for the efficient financial management and lawful operation of the facilities, programs or services;

Construct, maintain and operate the facilities, programs or services; and

With the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury, establish or cause to be established revolving loan fund programs to assist recipients of publicly funded services under this title to acquire or maintain affordable housing.

Each governing body of the facility, program, or service shall have an annual audit made of its accounts and records. The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall be responsible for ensuring that the audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and determining if the audits meet minimum audit standards that shall be prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. No audit may be accepted as meeting the requirements of this subsection (b) until the audit has been approved by the comptroller of the treasury. The audits may be prepared by the department of audit, or with the prior written approval of the comptroller, by a licensed independent public accountant.

All audits performed by the internal audit staff of the facility, program, or service shall be conducted in conformity with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury under § 4-3-304(9).

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 2; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-102; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 11; 1986, ch. 570, § 1; 1987, ch. 98, § 1; 1988, ch. 623, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-1-202; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-1-303. Powers of commissioner.

The commissioner may:

Select and recommend to the appropriate state officials the employment of the chief officers of all facilities of the department, all central office personnel, and all professional, technical and other personnel required for the operation of the department;

Recommend to the appropriate state officials the salaries and compensation of all officers and employees of the department;

Adopt rules and policies for the governance, management, and supervision of the department's facilities; prescribe the powers and duties of officers and employees; and provide for admission, discharge, treatment, habilitation, and support of persons with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disabilities;

Publish a report on the operation of the department and the facilities and programs under its supervision and the department's three-year plan; furnish the report and plan to the governor and members of the general assembly; and further distribute them as the commissioner, with the approval of the governor, may consider proper;

Publish compilations of this title and other relevant statutes to improve public knowledge of the laws by compiling them separately for services to children and adults and mental health and developmental disabilities service recipients and make the compilations available in print and on the Internet;

Prescribe and distribute the forms to be used in connection with the admission, hospitalization or release of service recipients in the department's facilities;

Alter the department's facilities and grounds and name them;

Order the transfer of service recipients between state facilities;

Procure insurance to indemnify full-time or part-time physicians, licensed psychologists designated as health service providers, and non-physician chief officers of all facilities of the department against actions by service recipients and others that are alleged to arise out of acts of omission or commission of those personnel;

Delegate responsibilities as the commissioner deems necessary for the effective conduct of the functions of the department; and

Assume general responsibility for the proper and efficient operation of the department, its facilities, services and supports.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, §§ 4, 7; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 4, 7; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 33-104, 33-107; Acts 1990, ch. 1024, § 17; 1992, ch. 991, § 12; T.C.A., § 33-1-203, former § 33-1-303; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-1-304. Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner shall:

Based on best practice and research, assess the needs of service recipients and potential service recipients throughout the state, plan for a system to meet the needs, set standards for services and supports for service recipients, promote the development of services and supports for service recipients in a community-based, family-oriented system, perform the department's duties, and achieve the department's goals;

Collaborate with all relevant state agencies to coordinate the administration of state programs and policies that directly affect service recipients with respect to treatment, habilitation and education;

Advise the governor, general assembly, state, local, and private agencies, and the public in matters affecting service recipients, and advocate meeting their needs; and

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, assist the council on children's mental health care in developing a plan that will establish demonstration sites in certain geographic areas where children's mental health care is child-centered, family-driven, and culturally and linguistically competent and that provides a coordinated system of care for children's mental health needs in this state.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2008, ch. 1062, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

Acts 2016, ch. 894, § 1 provided: On or before January 31, 2017, the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall submit a report to the health and welfare committee of the senate and the health committee of the house of representatives concerning the feasibility of a pilot program for one (1) county that seeks to address overcrowding in jails and correction institutions by providing diversionary or transitional services that include mental health services and supports, substance abuse treatment and counseling, health care, and employment and housing supports. The report shall examine, but not be limited to, the following topics:

The costs and benefits of implementing the pilot program;

The number of people the pilot program could expect to serve;

Approaches taken by other states to address prison diversion and prison transition issues where mental health and substance abuse services are involved;

Best practices for this type of pilot program;

Prospects for and barriers to potential expansion of the pilot programstatewide; and

Potential federal funding sources to support the pilot program.

33-1-305. Power of commissioner to adopt rules, prescribe forms and investigate complaints.

The commissioner may:

Adopt rules necessary to fulfill the department's responsibilities;

Prescribe the form of applications, records, reports and certificates provided for in this title and the information that forms shall contain; and

Investigate complaints by a service recipient or anyone on behalf of a service recipient.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 8; 1974, ch. 802, § 21; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 33-308, 33-1-205(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-1-306. Designation of administrative law judges or hearing officers.

The commissioner may designate employees as administrative law judges or hearing officers to conduct contested case hearings when cases are required to be held under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for admission review hearings for admission to department facilities.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-1-206; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-1-307. Departmental information systems.

The department shall establish a structured information system to gather all data necessary to carry out its duties with respect to planning, needs assessment, standard setting, evaluation, and promotion of the development of services and supports for the service recipient population, including persons who may become service recipients. The department shall design the system to avoid duplication of information gathering by other public agencies and to minimize acquisition of personally identifiable service recipient information. All public and private providers who serve persons with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disabilities, regardless of whether the provider is licensed under this title or other titles of the code or is unlicensed, shall provide the information required for the information system in a way consistent with this title and other laws.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-1-308. Interagency agreements.

The commissioner shall initiate the development of and enter into interagency agreements on services and supports for children in coordination with the council on children's mental health care, adults, and the elderly to:

Assure accountability for services and supports across all agencies providing services and supports for a person or family whose service is covered by this title;

Clarify responsibilities for the department's service system;

Promote problem resolution at the local levels;

Promote interagency service needs assessment and planning;

Provide a vehicle for interagency policy development without interfering with agency independence;

Promote creation and maintenance of coordinated service systems for service recipients and families;

Provide for interrelated service planning across agency lines;

Promote inclusion of mental health and developmental disabilities issues in crisis and disaster planning; and

Enhance the efficiency and effectiveness of expenditure of public funds.

All state agencies shall cooperate with the department in the development of the agreements.

The agreements shall include, without limitation: the intersection of services and supports among all state agencies that have any responsibility for mental health, developmental disabilities, alcohol dependence, drug dependence, education, health, social services, housing, transportation, employment, justice, habilitation, rehabilitation, correction, or public funding of services and supports; transition between services to different age groups; information sharing, including records, data, and service; and interagency training.

Interagency agreements should include at least the following elements:

Goals and the expected outcomes against which progress will be measured;

Eligible populations;

Role responsibilities;

Covered services and supports;

Procedures for coordination, including local level implementation procedures;

Joint monitoring;

Data sharing; and

How conflict resolution will be achieved.

The commissioner may initiate the development of and enter into similar interagency agreements with local government agencies.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2008, ch. 1062, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

33-1-309. Adoption of rules.

The department shall adopt all rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

All operating guidelines of the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities (sometimes referred to as “DIDD”) and its successors shall be adopted pursuant to the procedure set forth in this subsection (b). For purposes of this section “operating guidelines” means instructions to service providers that the department deems or intends to be mandatory upon such providers. Interpretive instructions, other nonmandatory guidance from the department and rules adopted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, are not operating guidelines.

The adoption of operating guidelines shall be preceded by notice, public meeting, opportunity for comment and responses to such comments from the department; provided, however, in those instances in which the department determines that exigent circumstances require that the operating guideline be implemented prior to a public meeting, the department shall begin the process required by this section as soon as reasonably practicable after its implementation.

The department shall provide notice in the Tennessee administrative register which shall include a general description of the subject of the operating guideline, the date, place and time of the public meeting and the opportunity for interested persons to provide oral or written comments. The date of the public meeting shall be no sooner than the first day of the month following the month of publication of the notice. The notice shall also include the name, address and telephone number of a contact person to provide additional information, including, if available, copies of the proposed operating guideline.

A representative of DIDD shall be present to hear comments at a hearing required by this section. The representative shall be a person designated by the deputy commissioner of DIDD who is a director level or higher employee. This designee shall be authorized to conduct the meeting in such a manner as to provide reasonable opportunity for all interested persons to provide comments.

Within thirty (30) days after the meeting, DIDD shall provide responses to the specific comments received and shall state the reasons for accepting or rejecting the comments. DIDD shall maintain an official record of the meeting, submitted comments and any responses.

Mandatory instructions meeting the definition of operating guidelines set forth in subsection (b) that have been implemented prior to July 1, 2001, shall not be required to be readopted pursuant to subsection (b) unless DIDD receives a petition signed by twenty-five (25) interested persons requesting a public meeting on the instruction. In that case, DIDD shall provide notice, a public meeting, opportunity for comment and responses to comment as set forth in subsection (b). An instruction that is the subject of the petition shall remain in effect. In the event that a proper petition is presented under this subsection (c) and DIDD determines that the same or substantially related issues are under consideration as a proposed operating guideline, the matters may be consolidated to avoid duplication.

All methodology utilized by DIDD for determining payment to service providers shall be adopted as rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, which shall be consistent among providers providing substantially the same services.

Intermediate care facilities for persons with mental retardation (ICF/MR) shall comply with rules and operating guidelines made applicable to ICF/MR facilities by DIDD. In order to monitor the care being received by persons in ICF/MR facilities, DIDD shall have reasonable access to the facilities and the medical and other records of the persons occupying the beds.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 337, § 1; 2006, ch. 761, § 2; 2007, ch. 499, § 1; 2009, ch. 477, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 29; 2011, ch. 158, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 477, § 1, directed the code commission to change all references from “division of mental retardation services” to “division of intellectual disabilities services” and to include the changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Attorney General Opinions. “Operating guidelines” would not be required to be promulgated as rules under the UAPA if T.C.A. §§ 3-1-309(b) and (c) are repealed, OAG 07-042, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (4/4/07).

33-1-310. Power to assume temporary control of facility in event of emergency.

If the department determines that an emergency substantially impairs a service provider agency's capacity to provide service to its service recipients and jeopardizes the health or safety of its service recipients, the department may assume temporary operating responsibility for the agency to assure continuity of care and the health and safety of the service recipients.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-1-311. Development of interagency projects and programs.

The department shall involve the council on children's mental health care in the development of interagency projects and programs, whether state or federally funded, related to children's mental health care, except where otherwise prohibited by state or federal law.

Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.